Utah statutes.
63B-11-106.   Constitutional debt limitation.

(1)  The commission may not issue bonds under this chapter in an amount that violates the limitation described in Utah Constitution Article XIV, Section 1.

(2)  For purposes of applying the debt limitation contained in Utah Constitution Article XIV, Section 1, the value of the taxable property in Utah is considered to be 100% of the fair market value of the taxable property of the state, including fee-in-lieu property, as computed from the last assessment for state purposes previous to the issuance of the bonds.



Enacted by Chapter 199, 2002 General Session

